Utah statutes.
53A-19-108.   Monthly budget reports.
(1)  The business administrator of each local school board shall provide each
board member with a report, on a monthly basis, that includes the following
information:
(a)  the amounts of all budget appropriations;
(b)  the disbursements from the appropriations as of the date of the report;
and
(c)  the percentage of the disbursements as of the date of the report.
(2)  A copy of the report shall be available for public review.
